Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-432] Adult and community education
authorized. To provide increased opportunity for the people of Hawaii, the
department shall establish and regulate a program of adult and community
education of less than college grade. The department shall provide public
school buildings and other facilities, and use public school equipment under
conditions determined by the department, when the equipment is needed, for
adult and community education programs. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next